Mississippi, session 2026, HB1846.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The following sum, or so much of it as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, to the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning to assist in paying the costs associated with the construction of an athletic stadium with a minimum combined seating and standing capacity of forty thousand (40,000) for Jackson State University to host the university's sporting events, including, but not limited to, making upgrades to infrastructure and real property under and around the stadium, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027 ................................................ $40,000,000.00. SECTION 2.  The following sum, or so much of it as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money in the State Treasury to the credit of the Capital Expense Fund not otherwise appropriated, to the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning to assist in paying the costs associated with the construction of an athletic stadium with a minimum combined seating and standing capacity of forty thousand (40,000) for Jackson State University to host the university's sporting events, including, but not limited to, making upgrades to infrastructure and real property under and around the stadium, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027............................... ................................................ $25,000,000.00. SECTION 3.  The money appropriated by Section 1 of this act shall be paid by the State Treasurer out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, and the money appropriated by Section 2 of this act shall be paid by the State Treasurer out of any money in the State Treasury to the credit of the Capital Expense Fund not otherwise appropriated, upon warrants issued by the State Fiscal Officer; and the State Fiscal Officer shall issue his or her warrants upon requisitions signed by the proper person, officer or officers in the manner provided by law. SECTION 4.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.